Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-103
Director of Banking and Finance; financial institutions; supervision and examination; director and department employees; prohibited acts; exception; penalty.

(1) The director shall have charge of and full supervision over the examination of banks and the enforcement of compliance with the statutes by banks and their holding companies in their business and functions and shall constructively aid and assist banks in maintaining proper banking standards and efficiency. The director shall also have charge of and full supervision over the examination of and the enforcement of compliance with the statutes by trust companies, building and loan associations, and credit unions in their business and functions and shall constructively aid and assist trust companies, building and loan associations, and credit unions in maintaining proper standards and efficiency.

(2) If the director is financially interested directly or indirectly in any financial institution doing business in Nebraska, subject to his or her jurisdiction, the financial institution shall be under the direct supervision of the Governor, and as to such financial institution, the Governor shall exercise all the supervisory powers otherwise vested in the Director of Banking and Finance by the laws of this state, and reports of examination by state bank examiners, foreign state bank examiners, examiners of the Federal Reserve Board, examiners of the Office of the Comptroller of the Currency, and examiners for the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation shall be transmitted to the Governor.

(3)(a) No person employed by the department shall be permitted to borrow money from any financial institution doing business in Nebraska subject to the jurisdiction of the department, except that persons employed by the department may borrow money in the normal course of business from the Nebraska State Employees Credit Union.

(b) In the event a loan to a person employed by the department is sold or otherwise transferred to a financial institution doing business in Nebraska and subject to the jurisdiction of the department, no violation of this section occurs if (i) the person employed by the department did not solicit the sale or transfer of the loan and (ii) the person employed by the department gives notice to the director of such sale or transfer. The director, in his or her discretion, may require such person to make all reasonable efforts to seek another lender.

(4) Any person who intentionally violates this section or who aids, abets, or assists in a violation of this section shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.

Laws 1933, c. 18, § 2, p. 135;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 8-1,123;

R.S.1943, § 8-102;

Laws 1963, c. 29, § 3, p. 135;

Laws 1967, c. 20, § 1, p. 122;

Laws 1985, LB 653, § 1;

Laws 1988, LB 375, § 2;

Laws 1996, LB 1053, § 1;

Laws 2002, LB 1094, § 2;

Laws 2003, LB 131, § 3.